en: Lemon sole
fr: Limande-sole
it: sogliola limanda

en: oarfish
ar: سمك مجدافي
ca: Regalècid
cs: hlístounovití
da: Sildekongefamilien
de: Riemenfische
eo: Rubandofiŝoj
es: Pez sable
fa: پاروماهی
fi: Airokalat
fr: ruban
he: דגי משוט
hr: riba veslo
hu: Szíjhalfélék
it: pesce remo
ko: 산갈치
la: Regalecidae
lt: Juostažuvinės
ms: Ikan dayung
nb: sildekongefamilien
nl: Riemvissen
nn: sildekongefamilien
ru: ремнетелые
sv: Sillkungfiskar
ta: துடுப்பு மீன்
tr: Kürek balığı
zh: 皇带鱼科

en: pangas, pangasius
de: pangasius
fr: pangasius, pangas
hr: pangas
it: pangasio
la: Pangasius hypophtalmus

en: Raw brown bullhead
fr: Pangasius cru, Poisson-chat cru
it: pesce gatto marrone crudo

en: pangas fillet
de: Pangasiusfilets
es: filetes de pangas
fr: filets de pangas
hr: pangas file
it: filetti di pangasio
nl: pangasiusfilets

en: pouting, bib, pout
bg: малка френска треска
br: Moulleg
ca: mòllera fosca
cy: Codyn Llwyd
de: Franzosendorsch
es: Faneca
eu: Paneka handi
fi: Partaturska
fr: tacaud, Tacaud commun
gl: Faneca
hr: dureći se
hu: Francia tőkehal
it: merluzzetto bruno
la: Trisopterus luscus
nb: Skjeggtorsk
nl: steenbolk
pl: Bielmik
pt: Faneca
sl: Francoski molič
sv: Skäggtorsk
zh: 條長臀鱈

en: snapper
fr: vivaneau

en: Russell's snapper
ar: نهاش روسيلي
fr: Vivaneau hublot
hr: russell's snapper
id: babak bangkau
la: Lutjanus russellii
sv: Russellsnapper
th: ปลากะพงข้างปาน
vi: Cá hồng chấm đen
zh: 黑星笛鯛

en: saithe, pollock
bg: сайда
bn: পোলক
br: Levneg du
ca: peix carboner
cs: treska tmavá
cy: Chwitlyn Glas
da: sej
de: Köhler, Köhlerfisch
el: Πόλοκ
es: carbonero
et: süsikas
eu: Ikazkin
fa: زغال‌ماهی شمالی
fi: seiti
fo: seiður
fr: Lieu Noir, colin lieu
hr: opis: saja (pollachius virens) je vrsta morske ribe iz roda pollachius.
hu: Fekete tőkehal
is: ufsi
it: merluzzo carbonaro
ja: シロイトダラ
kk: Сайда
ko: 북대서양대구
la: Pollachius virens
lt: Ledjūrio menkė
nb: sei
nl: koolvis
nn: sei
pa: ਪੋਲਕ
pl: Czarniak, dorsz czarny
pt: escamudo
ru: сайда
se: Sáidi
sq: pollock
sv: gråsej, sej
uk: Сайда
zh: 綠青鱈

fr: filet de lieu noir
fi: seitifilee
nl: koolvisfilet

en: salmon
af: Salm
ar: سلمون
az: Qızılbalıqlar
be: Ласосевыя
bg: Сьомга
bs: losos
ca: salmó
cs: losos
da: Laks, lakse
de: Lachs, Lachse
el: σολομού
eo: Salmo
es: salmón
eu: Izokin
fa: ماهی آزاد
fi: lohi, lohet, varsinaiset lohet
fo: Laksur
fr: saumon
ga: Bradán, bradáin
gd: Bradan
gl: Salmoninos
he: אלתית
hr: losos, lososa
ht: Somon
hu: lazac
id: Salmon
io: Salmono
is: Lax
it: salmone
ja: サケ亜科
jv: Iwak Salmon
kk: Лососъ
kn: ಸಾಲ್ಮನ್‌
la: Salmoninae
lv: Lašu apakšdzimta, Laša
ms: Salmon
my: ဆယ်လမွန်ငါး
nb: laksefisker
nl: zalm
no: lakse
pa: سالمن
pl: Łosoś
ps: سالمون
pt: salmão
ro: Lostriță
ru: Лососёвые, лосося
sl: Lososova
sr: лосос
su: Salmon
sv: Laxfiskar, lax
ta: சல்மான் மீன்
th: ปลาแซลมอน
tr: Sombalığı
vi: Cá hồi
zh: 鮭魚

en: wild salmon
de: Wildlachs
fr: saumon sauvage
hr: divlji losos
it: salmone selvatico

en: raw salmon
bg: сурова сьомга
de: Roher Lachs
es: salmon crudo
fr: saumon cru
hr: sirovi losos
it: salmone crudo
nl: rauwe zalm
pl: surowy łosoś
pt: Salmão cru
ru: сырая лосось

en: raw farmed Salmon
de: Roher gezüchteter Lachs
es: Salmón crudo de piscifactoría
fr: Saumon cru d'élevage
hr: sirovi uzgojeni losos
it: Salmone crudo di allevamento

en: raw wild Salmon
de: Roher wilder Lachs
es: Salmón crudo salvaje
fr: Saumon cru sauvage
hr: sirovi divlji losos
it: Salmone crudo selvaggio

fr: saumon cuit
de: Lachs gekocht

en: Microwaved farmed salmon
fr: Saumon d'élevage cuit au micro-ondes
it: salmone d'allevamento cotto al microonde

en: salmon fillet
bg: филе от сьомга
de: lachsfilet, lachsfilets
fi: lohifilee
fr: filet de saumon, filets de saumon
hr: file lososa
it: filetto di salmone
nl: zalmfilet
sv: laxfilé

en: smoked salmon
bg: пушена сьомга
de: Räucherlachs
es: Salmón ahumado
fi: savulohi
fr: saumon fumé
hr: dimljeni losos
it: salmone affumicato
nl: gerookte zalm

fr: chutes de saumon fumé
en: smoked salmon trimmings
de: geräucherte Lachsschnitte
es: recortes de salmón ahumado
hr: obrezci dimljenog lososa
it: scarti di salmone affumicato
nl: gerookte zalmresten